Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7666.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other general or special law to the contrary, Paul J. Rao
may join Spencer Rao and Michaela Smith in marriage within the Town of Foster, Rhode Island
on or about June 20, 2026. Paul J. Rao is hereby authorized and empowered to join the foregoing
persons in marriage pursuant to and in accordance with Chapter 3 of Title 15 of the General laws,
entitled “Solemnization of Marriages.”
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005196
========